Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.7 Possession and Trafficking in Dextromethorphan

21-28.7-1.
Possession of dextromethorphan.

No person may possess one gram or more of pure dextromethorphan or dextromethorphan as defined in accordance with U.S. pharmacopeia reference standards extracted from solid or liquid dose forms, other than a medical facility, medical practitioner, pharmacist or pharmacy licensed pursuant to title 5 of the general laws, and registrants under § 510 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 321 et seq.

A violation of this section shall carry a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first offense, and two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the second and subsequent offenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 215, § 1.